dev/dout.nouns.shemp.dix
    <pardef n="זיו/ן__n_m">
      <e><p>          <l>ן</l><r>ן<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ן</l><r>ן<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ני</l><r>ן<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px1sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ננו</l><r>ן<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px1pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>נך</l><r>ן<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px2sg_m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>נך</l><r>ן<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px2sg_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>נכם</l><r>ן<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px2pl_m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>נכן</l><r>ן<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px2pl_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>נן</l><r>ן<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px2pl_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>נו</l><r>ן<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px3sg_m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>נה</l><r>ן<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px3sg_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>נם</l><r>ן<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px3pl_m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>נים</l><r>ן<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ני</l><r>ן<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ניי</l><r>ן<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px1sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>נינו</l><r>ן<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px1pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ניך</l><r>ן<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px2sg_m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>נייך</l><r>ן<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px2sg_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ניכם</l><r>ן<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px2pl_m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ניכן</l><r>ן<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px2pl_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ניהן</l><r>ן<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px2pl_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ניו</l><r>ן<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px3sg_m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ניה</l><r>ן<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px3sg_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ניהם</l><r>ן<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px3pl_m"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="/סמיכה__n_f">
      <e><p>          <l>סמיכה</l><r>סמיכה<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>סמיכת</l><r>סמיכה<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>סמיכתי</l><r>סמיכה<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px1sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>סמיכתנו</l><r>סמיכה<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px1pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>סמיכתך</l><r>סמיכה<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px2sg_m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>סמיכתך</l><r>סמיכה<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px2sg_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>סמיכתכם</l><r>סמיכה<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px2pl_m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>סמיכתכן</l><r>סמיכה<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px2pl_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>סמיכתן</l><r>סמיכה<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px2pl_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>סמיכתו</l><r>סמיכה<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px3sg_m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>סמיכתה</l><r>סמיכה<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px3sg_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>סמיכתם</l><r>סמיכה<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px3pl_m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>gen</l><r>סמיכה<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>gen</l><r>סמיכה<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>genיי</l><r>סמיכה<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px1sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>genינו</l><r>סמיכה<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px1pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>genיך</l><r>סמיכה<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px2sg_m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>genייך</l><r>סמיכה<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px2sg_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>genיכם</l><r>סמיכה<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px2pl_m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>genיכן</l><r>סמיכה<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px2pl_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>genיהן</l><r>סמיכה<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px2pl_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>genיו</l><r>סמיכה<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px3sg_m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>genיה</l><r>סמיכה<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px3sg_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>genיהם</l><r>סמיכה<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px3pl_m"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="חיו/ך__n_m">
      <e><p>          <l>ך</l><r>ך<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ך</l><r>ך<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>כי</l><r>ך<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px1sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>כנו</l><r>ך<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px1pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>כך</l><r>ך<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px2sg_m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>כך</l><r>ך<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px2sg_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ככם</l><r>ך<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px2pl_m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ככן</l><r>ך<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px2pl_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>כן</l><r>ך<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px2pl_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>כו</l><r>ך<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px3sg_m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>כה</l><r>ך<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px3sg_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>כם</l><r>ך<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px3pl_m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>כים</l><r>ך<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>כי</l><r>ך<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>כיי</l><r>ך<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px1sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>כינו</l><r>ך<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px1pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>כיך</l><r>ך<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px2sg_m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>כייך</l><r>ך<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px2sg_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>כיכם</l><r>ך<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px2pl_m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>כיכן</l><r>ך<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px2pl_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>כיהן</l><r>ך<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px2pl_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>כיו</l><r>ך<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px3sg_m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>כיה</l><r>ך<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px3sg_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>כיהם</l><r>ך<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px3pl_m"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
  </pardefs>

    <e lm="לכלוך"><i>לכלו</i><par n="חיו/ך__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="שינון"><i>שינו</i><par n="זיו/ן__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="חיכוך"><i>חיכו</i><par n="חיו/ך__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="טיגון"><i>טיגו</i><par n="זיו/ן__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="גיבון"><i>גיבו</i><par n="זיו/ן__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="שיוך"><i>שיו</i><par n="חיו/ך__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="לכסון"><i>לכסו</i><par n="זיו/ן__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="צינון"><i>צינו</i><par n="זיו/ן__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="איזון"><i>איזו</i><par n="זיו/ן__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="חיוך"><i>חיו</i><par n="חיו/ך__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="תארוך"><i>תארו</i><par n="חיו/ך__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="דרבון"><i>דרבו</i><par n="זיו/ן__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="עישון"><i>עישו</i><par n="זיו/ן__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="הילוך"><i>הילו</i><par n="חיו/ך__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="ליחוך"><i>ליחו</i><par n="חיו/ך__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="ראיון"><i>ראיו</i><par n="זיו/ן__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="שידוך"><i>שידו</i><par n="חיו/ך__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="ריכוך"><i>ריכו</i><par n="חיו/ך__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="סנכרון"><i>סנכרו</i><par n="זיו/ן__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="כיוון"><i>כיוו</i><par n="זיו/ן__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="היוון"><i>היוו</i><par n="זיו/ן__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="איון"><i>איו</i><par n="זיו/ן__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="תכנון"><i>תכנו</i><par n="זיו/ן__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="סרטון"><i>סרטו</i><par n="זיו/ן__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="יישון"><i>יישו</i><par n="זיו/ן__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="סקרון"><i>סקרו</i><par n="זיו/ן__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="יינון"><i>יינו</i><par n="זיו/ן__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="תזמון"><i>תזמו</i><par n="זיו/ן__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="ייוון"><i>ייוו</i><par n="זיו/ן__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="תחמון"><i>תחמו</i><par n="זיו/ן__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="קינון"><i>קינו</i><par n="זיו/ן__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="עצבון"><i>עצבו</i><par n="זיו/ן__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="ריסון"><i>ריסו</i><par n="זיו/ן__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="תדרוך"><i>תדרו</i><par n="חיו/ך__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="תיכון"><i>תיכו</i><par n="זיו/ן__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="כינון"><i>כינו</i><par n="זיו/ן__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="עמלון"><i>עמלו</i><par n="זיו/ן__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="ייחצון"><i>ייחצו</i><par n="זיו/ן__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="גרעון"><i>גרעו</i><par n="זיו/ן__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="פכפוך"><i>פכפו</i><par n="חיו/ך__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="רענון"><i>רענו</i><par n="זיו/ן__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="רינון"><i>רינו</i><par n="זיו/ן__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="סמיכה"><i></i><par n="/סמיכה__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="שערוך"><i>שערו</i><par n="חיו/ך__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="עדכון"><i>עדכו</i><par n="זיו/ן__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="שכשוך"><i>שכשו</i><par n="חיו/ך__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="גיחוך"><i>גיחו</i><par n="חיו/ך__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="חינון"><i>חינו</i><par n="זיו/ן__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="חינוך"><i>חינו</i><par n="חיו/ך__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="דיפון"><i>דיפו</i><par n="זיו/ן__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="סימון"><i>סימו</i><par n="זיו/ן__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="גיוון"><i>גיוו</i><par n="זיו/ן__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="סכסוך"><i>סכסו</i><par n="חיו/ך__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="מיכון"><i>מיכו</i><par n="זיו/ן__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="ניגון"><i>ניגו</i><par n="זיו/ן__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="איבון"><i>איבו</i><par n="זיו/ן__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="דכדוך"><i>דכדו</i><par n="חיו/ך__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="חיתון"><i>חיתו</i><par n="זיו/ן__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="חיתוך"><i>חיתו</i><par n="חיו/ך__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="מיון"><i>מיו</i><par n="זיו/ן__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="זיכוך"><i>זיכו</i><par n="חיו/ך__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="מיגון"><i>מיגו</i><par n="זיו/ן__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="עיון"><i>עיו</i><par n="זיו/ן__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="מיעון"><i>מיעו</i><par n="זיו/ן__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="חמצון"><i>חמצו</i><par n="זיו/ן__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="חיסון"><i>חיסו</i><par n="זיו/ן__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="שיכוך"><i>שיכו</i><par n="חיו/ך__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="שיכון"><i>שיכו</i><par n="זיו/ן__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="תמרון"><i>תמרו</i><par n="זיו/ן__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="עיגון"><i>עיגו</i><par n="זיו/ן__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="מיסוך"><i>מיסו</i><par n="חיו/ך__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="אבחון"><i>אבחו</i><par n="זיו/ן__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="כוונון"><i>כוונו</i><par n="זיו/ן__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="שיתוך"><i>שיתו</i><par n="חיו/ך__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="תיקון"><i>תיקו</i><par n="זיו/ן__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="ליבון"><i>ליבו</i><par n="זיו/ן__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="סינון"><i>סינו</i><par n="זיו/ן__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="תיווך"><i>תיוו</i><par n="חיו/ך__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="גינון"><i>גינו</i><par n="זיו/ן__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="ריתוך"><i>ריתו</i><par n="חיו/ך__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="אפנון"><i>אפנו</i><par n="זיו/ן__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="איכון"><i>איכו</i><par n="זיו/ן__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="סיכוך"><i>סיכו</i><par n="חיו/ך__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="סיכון"><i>סיכו</i><par n="זיו/ן__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="אחסון"><i>אחסו</i><par n="זיו/ן__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="משכון"><i>משכו</i><par n="זיו/ן__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="סגנון"><i>סגנו</i><par n="זיו/ן__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="הנהון"><i>הנהו</i><par n="זיו/ן__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="סיבוך"><i>סיבו</i><par n="חיו/ך__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="אימון"><i>אימו</i><par n="זיו/ן__n_m"/></e>
